Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.04.045

Director—Powers under chapter 19.144 RCW.

The director or the director's designee may take such action as provided for in this title to enforce, investigate, or examine persons covered by chapter 19.144 RCW.

[ 2008 c 108 s 15. Formerly RCW 30.04.045.]

NOTES:

Findings—2008 c 108: See RCW 19.144.005.